Vermont statutes. Title 23 Motor Vehicles
Article 1. General Provisions

§ 301.
Persons required to register.

Residents, except as provided in chapter 35 of this title, shall annually register motor vehicles owned or leased for a period of more than 30 days and operated by them, unless currently registered in Vermont. Notwithstanding this section, a resident who has moved into the State from another jurisdiction shall register his or her motor vehicle within 60 days of moving into the State. A person shall not operate a motor vehicle nor draw a trailer or semi-trailer on any highway unless such vehicle is registered as provided in this chapter. Vehicle owners who have apportioned power units registered in this State under the International Registration Plan are exempt from the requirement to register their trailers in this State.

HISTORY:

Amended

1961, No. 97

, § 1, eff. May 3, 1961;

1985, No. 124

(Adj. Sess.), § 6;

2003, No. 56

, § 70, eff. June 4, 2003;

2015, No. 47

, § 6;

2019, No. 60

, § 15.

§ 301a.
Repealed. 2015, No. 47, § 5.

§ 302.
Period of registration.

Except as otherwise provided in this title, every motor vehicle shall be registered for a period of 12 months from date of issue. Registrations made pursuant to subsections 305(b), 371(b), 376(b), and 376(c) of this title shall expire and the certificate thereof shall become void five years after the date of issue.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of this title, if registered owners so elect, all their registrations may be issued to expire on the same date and the registration fee shall be pro-rated for the amount in excess of the annual 12 months’ fee but not to exceed 24 months.

HISTORY:

Amended

1961, No. 54

, § 1, eff. April 1, 1962;

1965, No. 70

, § 1;

1969, No. 259

(Adj. Sess.), § 6;

1975, No. 90

, § 1;

1977, No. 85

, § 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1977;

1979, No. 34

, § 1, eff. Nov. 1, 1979;

1995, No. 49

, § 1, eff. April 20, 1995;

1995, No. 112

(Adj. Sess.), § 3;

1997, No. 39

, § 1;

2015, No. 47

, § 7.

§ 303.
Application required.

The Commissioner or his or her duly authorized agent shall register a motor vehicle, trailer, or semi-trailer when application therefor, on a form prescribed by the Commissioner, showing such motor vehicle to be properly equipped and in good mechanical condition, is filed with him or her, accompanied by the required registration fee and evidence of the applicant’s ownership of the vehicle in such form as the Commissioner may reasonably require. Except for State or municipal vehicles, registrants and titled owners shall be identical.

An application for registration may be refused by the Commissioner if it is not accompanied by proof of payment of the use tax imposed by Section 4481 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 in such form as may be prescribed by the Secretary of the Treasury or in another form acceptable to the Commissioner in the case of vehicles that are subject to the tax.

HISTORY:

Amended

1983, No. 123

(Adj. Sess.), eff. April 2, 1984;

1995, No. 19

, § 10, eff. April 17, 1995.

§ 304.
Registration certificates; number plates; vanity and other special plates.

The Commissioner shall issue to the registrant of a motor vehicle a certificate of registration in the form the Commissioner may prescribe, on which shall appear the name of the registrant, his or her address, a brief description of the vehicle registered, and the date of registration. The Commissioner shall also assign to each motor vehicle registered a distinctive number and issue a number plate or plates showing the assigned number. The number plate or plates issued shall be of the material, size, shape, and color, and with the numerals or letters thereon, the Commissioner may determine, and shall be reflectorized in part or in whole. The certificate and number plates shall be delivered free of charge by the Commissioner to the registrant as soon as may be after receipt and acceptance of application for registration.

The authority to issue vanity motor vehicle number plates or special number plates for safety organizations and service organizations shall reside with the Commissioner. Determination of compliance with the criteria contained in this section shall be within the discretion of the Commissioner. Series of number plates for safety and service organizations that are authorized by the Commissioner shall be issued in order of approval, subject to the operating considerations in the Department as determined by the Commissioner. The Commissioner shall issue vanity and special organization number plates in the following manner:

Vanity plates. Subject to the restrictions of this section, vanity plates shall be issued at the request of the registrant of a motor vehicle unless the vehicle is registered under the International Registration Plan, upon application and upon payment of an annual fee of $48.00 in addition to the annual fee for registration. The Commissioner shall not issue two sets of plates bearing the same initials or letters unless the plates also contain a distinguishing number. Vanity plates are subject to reassignment if not renewed within 60 days of expiration of the registration.

Special organization plates.

For the purposes of this section:

“Safety organizations” are groups that provide police and fire protection, rescue squads, the Vermont National Guard, organizations required to respond to public emergencies, and amateur radio operators licensed by the U.S. Federal Communications Commission. To qualify for a special organization plate, safety organizations must have at least 100 in-state members in good standing.

“Service organization” includes congressionally chartered or noncongressionally chartered U.S. Military Service veterans’ groups and any group that:

has as a primary purpose service to the community through specific programs for the improvement of public health, education, or environmental awareness and conservation and is not limited to social activities;

has nonprofit status under Section 501(c)(3) or (10) of the U.S. Internal Revenue Code, as amended;

is registered as a nonprofit corporation with the Office of the Secretary of State; and

except for a military veterans group, has at least 100 in-state members in good standing.

The officer of a safety organization or service organization may apply to the Commissioner to approve special plates indicating membership in a qualifying organization to be issued to organization members for a $17.00 special fee for each set of plates in addition to the annual fee for registration. The application shall include designation of an officer or member to serve as the principal contact with the Department and a distinctive name or emblem, or both, for use on the proposed special plate. The name and emblem shall not be objectively obscene or confusing to the general public and shall not promote, advertise, or endorse a product, brand, or service provided for sale. The organization’s name and emblem must not infringe on or violate a trademark, trade name, service mark, copyright, or other proprietary or property right, and the organization must have the right to use the name and emblem. After consulting with the principal contact, the Commissioner shall determine the design of the special plate on the basis that the primary purpose of motor vehicle number plates is vehicle identification. An organization may have only one design, regardless of the number of individual organizational units, squads, or departments within the State that may conduct the same or substantially similar activities.

After the plate design is finalized and an officer or the principal contact provides the Commissioner a written statement authorizing issuance of the plates, the organization shall deposit $2,200.00 with the Commissioner. Of this deposit, $500.00 shall be retained by the Department to recover costs of developing the organization plate. Notwithstanding

32 V.S.A. § 502

, the Commissioner may charge the actual costs of production of the plates against the fees collected and the balance shall be deposited in the Transportation Fund. Upon application, special plates shall be issued to a registrant of a vehicle registered at the pleasure car rate or of a truck registered for less than 26,001 pounds (but excluding trucks registered under the International Registration Plan) who furnishes the Commissioner satisfactory proof that he or she is a member of an organization that has satisfied the requirements of this subdivision (b)(2). For each of the first 100 applicants to whom sets of plates are issued, the $17.00 special plate fee shall not be collected and shall be subtracted from the balance of the deposit. When the $1,700.00 balance of the deposit is depleted, applicants shall be required to pay the $17.00 fee as provided for in subdivision (2)(B) of this subsection. No organization shall charge its members any additional fee or premium charge for the authorization, right, or privilege to display special number plates, but any organization may recover up to $1,700.00 from applicants for the special plates.

When an individual’s membership in a qualifying organization ceases or is terminated, the individual shall surrender any special registration plates issued under this subsection to the Commissioner forthwith. However, a retired member of the Vermont National Guard may renew or, upon payment of a $10.00 fee, acquire, the special guard plates after notification of eligibility for retired pay has been received.

The Commissioner shall issue registration numbers 101 through 9999, which shall be known as reserved registration numbers, for pleasure cars, motor trucks that are registered at the pleasure car rate, and motorcycles in the following manner:

A person holding a reserved registration number may retain the number for the ensuing registration period, provided application is made at least 60 days prior to expiration of the registration.

If the registrant does not renew the registration, the number may be reassigned to a member of the immediate family if application is made at least 60 days prior to expiration of the registration. As used in this subsection, “immediate family” means the spouse, household member, grandparents, parents, siblings, children, or grandchildren of the registrant.

The Commissioner shall restrict the issuance of these registrations to residents of this State and may restrict issuance to applicants who do not already have such a registration issued to them.

A person holding a reserved registration number on a pleasure car, a truck that is registered at the pleasure car rate, or a motorcycle may be issued the same reserved registration number for the other authorized vehicle types, provided that the person receives no more than one such plate or set of plates for each authorized vehicle type.

Vanity or special organization number plates, whether new or renewed, shall be issued in any combination or succession of numerals and letters, provided the total of the numbers and letters on any plate taken together does not exceed seven, and further provided the requested combination of letters and numerals does not duplicate or resemble a regular issue registration plate. The Commissioner may adopt rules for the issuance of vanity or special organization number plates to ensure that all plates serve the primary purpose of vehicle identification. The Commissioner may revoke any plate described in this subsection and shall not issue plates with combinations of letters or numbers that objectively, in any language:

are vulgar, scatological, or obscene, or constitute racial or ethnic epithets;

connote breast, genitalia, pubic area, or buttocks or relate to sexual or eliminatory functions;

refer to any intoxicant or drug; to the use, nonuse, distribution, or sale of an intoxicant or drug; or to a user, nonuser, or purveyor of an intoxicant or drug;

refer to gender, gender identity, sexual orientation, or disability status;

suggest a government or governmental agency;

suggest a privilege not given by law in this State; or

form a slang term, abbreviation, phonetic spelling, or mirror image of a word described in subdivisions (1) through (6) of this subsection.

[Repealed.]

Upon the request of a registrant of a motor vehicle with the previous issue number plates, the Commissioner shall issue current issue number plates bearing the same number as shown on the previous issue plates that are being replaced. The initial one-time fee for the plates shall be $24.00 in addition to the regular registration fee. Official plates and plates with numbers of 9999 or lower are specifically exempted.

Number plates bearing the Vermont Coat of Arms may be issued only to the Governor, members of the Vermont congressional delegation and members of the General Assembly.

The Department, on a quarterly basis, shall provide information to licensed inspection stations for distribution to the owners of motor vehicles during the annual inspection of their motor vehicles. That information shall encourage the proper management of used oil and shall include the telephone number of a recycling hotline that residents may call to determine the availability of a collection service that accepts used oil at the curb or otherwise to find the nearest location to recycle used oil.

The Department and the Agency of Natural Resources shall work cooperatively regarding opportunities to provide information to the public with respect to the proper management of used oil and shall take appropriate steps to implement efficient and effective information distribution measures mutually agreed upon by the Department and the Agency.

The Commissioner of Motor Vehicles shall, upon proper application, issue special plates to Vermont veterans, as defined in 38 U.S.C. § 101(2), and to members of the U.S. Armed Forces, as defined in 38 U.S.C. § 101(10), for use on vehicles registered at the pleasure car rate, on vehicles registered at the motorcycle rate, and on trucks registered for less than 26,001 pounds and excluding vehicles registered under the International Registration Plan. The type and style of the plate shall be determined by the Commissioner, except that an American flag, or a veteran- or military-related emblem selected by the Commissioner and the Vermont Office of Veterans’ Affairs shall appear on one side of the plate. At a minimum, emblems shall be available to recognize recipients of the Purple Heart, Pearl Harbor survivors, former prisoners of war, and disabled veterans. An applicant shall apply on a form prescribed by the Commissioner, and the applicant’s eligibility as a member of one of the groups recognized will be certified by the Office of Veterans’ Affairs. The plates shall be reissued only to the original holder of the plates or the surviving spouse. The Commissioner may adopt rules to implement the provisions of this subsection. Except for new or renewed registrations, applications for the issuance of plates under this subsection shall be processed in the order received by the Department subject to normal workflow considerations. The costs associated with developing new emblems shall be borne by the Department of Motor Vehicles.

The Commissioner of Motor Vehicles shall, upon proper application, issue special gold star and next-of-kin plates for use only on vehicles registered at the pleasure car rate and on trucks registered for less than 26,001 pounds and excluding vehicles registered under the International Registration Plan, as follows:
(k) (1) The Commissioner of Motor Vehicles shall, upon proper application, issue special gold star and next-of-kin plates for use only on vehicles registered at the pleasure car rate and on trucks registered for less than 26,001 pounds and excluding vehicles registered under the International Registration Plan, as follows:

Gold star plates shall be issued to the widow or widower, parents, and next of kin as defined in

10 U.S.C. § 1126(d)

of members of the U.S. Armed Forces who lost their lives under the circumstances described in

10 U.S.C. § 1126(a)

.

Next-of-kin plates shall be issued to the widow or widower, parents, and next of kin as defined in

10 U.S.C. § 1126(d)

of members of the Armed Forces not eligible for gold star plates under subdivision (A) of this subdivision (1) who lost their lives while serving on active duty or on active duty for training, or while assigned in a Reserve or National Guard unit in drill status, or as a result of injury or illness incurred during such service or assignment.

The type and style of the gold star and next-of-kin plates shall be determined by the Commissioner and the Vermont Office of Veterans’ Affairs, except that a gold star shall appear on one side of gold star plates and a distinct emblem shall be approved for next-of-kin plates. An applicant shall apply on a form prescribed by the Commissioner, and the applicant’s eligibility will be certified by the Office of Veterans’ Affairs. A plate shall be reissued only to the original holder of the plate. The Commissioner may adopt rules to implement the provisions of this subsection. Except for new or renewed registrations, applications for the issuance of gold star or next-of-kin plates shall be processed in the order received by the Department subject to normal workflow considerations.

HISTORY:

Amended

1961, No. 54

, § 2, eff. April 1, 1962;

1965, No. 154

, § 1;

1967, No. 129

, § 2;

1975, No. 218

(Adj. Sess.), § 7, eff. April 1, 1976;

1977, No. 258

(Adj. Sess.), §§ 1, 2, eff. April 19, 1978;

1979, No. 190

(Adj. Sess.), § 1;

1987, No. 112

, § 5;

1987, No. 230

(Adj. Sess.);

1987, No. 241

(Adj. Sess.), § 13;

1989, No. 51

, § 11;

1989, No. 82

, § 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1990;

1991, No. 178

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. Dec. 1, 1992;

1993, No. 220

(Adj. Sess.), § 2;

1993, No. 233

(Adj. Sess.), § 93, eff. June 21, 1994;

1995, No. 49

, § 3, eff. April 20, 1995;

1995, No. 112

(Adj. Sess.), § 4;

1995, No. 189

(Adj. Sess.), § 17;

1997, No. 85

(Adj. Sess.), §§ 1, 2;

1997, No. 85

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. Nov. 11, 1998;

1999, No. 1

, § 77c, eff. March 31, 1999;

1999, No. 1

55

(Adj. Sess.), § 12e;

2001, No. 102

(Adj. Sess.), § 6, eff. May 15, 2002;

2003, No. 109

(Adj. Sess.), §§ 1, 2;

2003, No. 160

(Adj. Sess.), § 62, eff. June 9, 2004;

2005, No. 175

(Adj. Sess.), § 27;

2007, No. 61

, § 3;

2007, No. 181

(Adj. Sess.), §§ 1-3, eff. May 30, 2008;

2009, No. 50

, § 37;

2011, No. 46

, § 3;

2011, No. 128

(Adj. Sess.), § 11;

2011, No. 164

(Adj. Sess.), § 12;

2013, No. 189

(Adj. Sess.), § 2;

2015, No. 159

(Adj. Sess.), § 8;

2019, No. 131

(Adj. Sess.), § 139.

§ 304a.
Special registration plates and placards for individuals with disabilities.

As used in this section:

“Ambulatory disability” means an impairment that prevents or impedes walking. An individual shall be considered to have an ambulatory disability if he or she:

cannot walk 200 feet without stopping to rest;

cannot walk without the use of, or assistance from, a brace, cane, crutch, another individual, prosthetic device, wheelchair, or other assistive device;

is restricted by lung disease to such an extent that the individual’s forced (respiratory) expiratory volume for one second, when measured by spirometry, is less than one liter, or the arterial oxygen tension is less than 60 mm/hg on room air at rest;

uses portable oxygen;

has a cardiac condition to the extent that the individual’s functional limitations are classified in severity as Class III or Class IV according to standards set by the American Heart Association; or

is severely limited in his or her ability to walk due to an arthritic, neurological, or orthopedic condition.

“Blind” means the visual impairment of an individual whose central visual acuity does not exceed 20/200 in the better eye with corrective lenses or whose visual acuity, if better than 20/200, is accompanied by a limit to the field of vision in the better eye to such a degree that its widest diameter subtends an angle of no greater than 20 degrees.

“Special registration plates” means a registration plate for individuals with disabilities that displays the International Symbol of Access:

in a color that contrasts with the background; and

in the same size as the letters or numbers on the plate.

“Removable windshield placard” means a two-sided, hanger style placard which includes on each side:

the International Symbol of Access, which is at least three inches in height, centered on the placard, and is a color that contrasts with the placard’s background color;

an identification number;

a date of expiration; and

the seal or other identification of the issuing authority.

“Temporary removable windshield placard” means a two-sided hanger style placard which includes on each side:

the International Symbol of Access, which is at least three inches in height, centered on the placard, and is a color that contrasts with the placard’s background color;

an identification number;

a date of expiration; and

the seal or other identification of the issuing authority.

“Eligible person” means:

an individual who is blind or has an ambulatory disability and has been issued a special registration plate or a windshield placard by this State or another state;

a person who is transporting an individual described in subdivision (A) of this subdivision (6); or

an individual transporting an individual who is blind or has an ambulatory disability on behalf of an organization that has been issued a special registration plate or a windshield placard by this State or another state for the purpose of transporting an individual who is blind or has an ambulatory disability.

Special registration plates or removable windshield placards, or both, shall be issued by the Commissioner. The placard shall be issued without a fee to an individual who is blind or has an ambulatory disability. One set of plates shall be issued without additional fees for a vehicle registered or leased to an individual who is blind or has an ambulatory disability or to a parent or guardian of an individual with a permanent disability. The Commissioner shall issue these placards or plates under rules adopted by him or her after proper application has been made to the Commissioner by any person residing within the State. Application forms shall be available on request at the Department of Motor Vehicles.

Upon application for a special registration plate or removable windshield placard, the Commissioner shall send a form prescribed by him or her to the applicant to be signed and returned by a licensed physician, licensed physician assistant, or licensed advanced practice registered nurse. The Commissioner shall file the form for future reference and issue the placard or plate. A new application shall be submitted every four years in the case of placards and at every third registration renewal for plates but in no case greater than every four years. When a licensed physician, licensed physician assistant, or licensed advanced practice registered nurse has previously certified to the Commissioner that an applicant’s condition is both permanent and stable, a special registration plate or placard need not be renewed.

Upon application of an organization, the Commissioner shall issue special registration plates for a vehicle registered in the applicant’s name if the vehicle is primarily used to transport individuals who have an ambulatory disability or are blind. Placards shall also be issued without a fee, upon application in a form prescribed by the Commissioner, to an organization to be used when transporting individuals who have an ambulatory disability or are blind. The plates and placards shall be subject to the restrictions set forth in subdivision (a)(3) of this section.

An individual with a disability who abuses such privileges or allows individuals not disabled to abuse the privileges provided in this section may have this privilege revoked after suitable notice and opportunity for hearing has been given him or her by the Commissioner. Hearings under the provisions of this section shall be held in accordance with sections 105-107 of this title and shall be subject to review by the Civil Division of the Superior Court of the county where the individual with a disability resides.

An applicant for a registration plate or placard for individuals with disabilities may request the Civil Division of the Superior Court in the county in which he or she resides to review a decision by the Commissioner to deny his or her application for a special registration plate or placard.

If the authenticity of the medical need for the special registration is challenged with reasons in writing, the Commissioner may have physicians with the Vermont Department of Health review the medical facts, with the knowledge of the individual with a disability and the licensed physician, licensed physician assistant, or licensed advanced practice registered nurse who filled in the medical form for the special registration, in order to determine eligibility and so notify all concerned of the facts and the recommendations.

On a form prescribed by the Commissioner, a nonprofit organization that provides volunteer drivers to transport individuals who have an ambulatory disability or are blind may apply to the Commissioner for a placard. Placards shall be marked “volunteer driver.” The organization shall ensure proper use of placards and maintain an accurate and complete record of the volunteer drivers to whom the placards are given by the organization. Placards shall be returned to the organization when the volunteer driver is no longer performing that service. Abuse of the privileges provided by the placards may result in the privileges being revoked and the placards repossessed by the Commissioner. Revocation may occur only after suitable notice and opportunity for a hearing. Hearings shall be held in accordance with sections 105-107 of this title.

Eligible persons may park vehicles with special registration plates or removable windshield placards issued by any state in special parking spaces when:

the placard is displayed:

by hanging it from the front windshield rearview mirror in such a manner that it may be viewed from the front and rear of the vehicle; or

if the vehicle has no rearview mirror, on the dashboard;

the plate is mounted as provided in section 511 of this title; or

the plate is mounted or the placard displayed as provided by the law of the jurisdiction where the vehicle is registered.

Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, an eligible person shall be permitted to park, and to park without fee, for at least 10 continuous days in a parking space or area that is restricted as to the length of time parking is permitted or where parking fees are assessed.
(d) (1) Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, an eligible person shall be permitted to park, and to park without fee, for at least 10 continuous days in a parking space or area that is restricted as to the length of time parking is permitted or where parking fees are assessed.

Notwithstanding the 10-day period in subdivision (1) of this subsection, in the case of a State- or municipally operated parking garage, an eligible person shall be permitted to park, and to park without fee, for at least 24 continuous hours.

This subsection shall not apply to spaces or areas in which parking, standing, or stopping of all vehicles is prohibited by law or by any parking ban or that are reserved for special vehicles. As a condition to the privilege conferred by this subsection, the vehicle shall display the registration plate or placard issued by the Commissioner, or a special registration license plate or placard issued by any other jurisdiction, in accordance with subsection (c) of this section.

An individual, other than an eligible person, who for his or her own purposes parks a vehicle in a space for individuals with disabilities shall be subject to a civil penalty of not less than $200.00 for each violation and shall be liable for towing charges.
(e) (1) An individual, other than an eligible person, who for his or her own purposes parks a vehicle in a space for individuals with disabilities shall be subject to a civil penalty of not less than $200.00 for each violation and shall be liable for towing charges.

An individual, other than an eligible person, who displays a special registration plate or removable windshield placard not issued to him or her under this section and parks a vehicle in a space for individuals with disabilities, shall be subject to a civil penalty of not less than $400.00 for each violation and shall be liable for towing charges.

A person who violates this section also shall be liable for storage charges not to exceed $12.00 per day, and an artisan’s lien may be imposed against the vehicle for payment of the charges assessed.

The person in charge of the parking space or spaces for individuals with a disability or any duly authorized law enforcement officer shall cause the removal of a vehicle parked in violation of this section.

A violation of this section shall be considered a traffic violation within the meaning of 4 V.S.A. chapter 29.

Individuals who have a temporary ambulatory disability may apply for a temporary removable windshield placard to the Commissioner on a form prescribed by him or her. The placard shall be valid for a period of up to six months and displayed as required under the provisions of subsection (c) of this section. The application shall be signed by a licensed physician, licensed physician assistant, or licensed advanced practice registered nurse. The validation period of the temporary placard shall be established on the basis of the written recommendation from a licensed physician, licensed physician assistant, or licensed advanced practice registered nurse. The Commissioner shall adopt rules to implement the provisions of this subsection.

HISTORY:

Added

1987, No. 268

(Adj. Sess.), § 9, eff. June 21, 1988; amended

1989, No. 51

, § 12;

1989, No. 56

;

1991, No. 131

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1993;

1999, No. 34

, § 5;

1999, No. 155

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. May 29, 2000;

2003, No. 151

(Adj. Sess.), § 7;

2003, No. 160

(Adj. Sess.), § 60, eff. June 9, 2004;

2005, No. 188

(Adj. Sess.), § 2;

2007, No. 61

, § 4;

2009, No. 82

(Adj. Sess.), § 1;

2009, No. 154

(Adj. Sess.), § 238;

2011, No. 62

, § 39;

2013, No. 57

, § 4;

2013, No. 96

(Adj. Sess.), § 142;

2015, No. 23

, § 121;

2015, No. 50

, § 7;

2017, No. 71

, § 1;

2017, No. 132

(Adj. Sess.), § 7;

2017, No. 206

(Adj. Sess.), § 1;

2019, No. 131

(Adj. Sess.), § 140.

§ 304b.
Conservation motor vehicle registration plates.

The Commissioner shall, upon application, issue conservation registration plates for use only on vehicles registered at the pleasure car rate, on trucks registered for less than 26,001 pounds, and on vehicles registered to State agencies under section 376 of this title, but excluding vehicles registered under the International Registration Plan. Plates so acquired shall be mounted on the front and rear of the vehicle. The Commissioners of Motor Vehicles and of Fish and Wildlife shall determine the graphic design of the special plates in a manner that serves to enhance the public awareness of the State’s interest in restoring and protecting its wildlife and major watershed areas. The Commissioners of Motor Vehicles and of Fish and Wildlife may alter the graphic design of these special plates, provided that plates in use at the time of a design alteration shall remain valid subject to the operator’s payment of the annual registration fee. Applicants shall apply on forms prescribed by the Commissioner and shall pay an initial fee of $26.00 in addition to the annual fee for registration. In following years, in addition to the annual registration fee, the holder of a conservation plate shall pay a renewal fee of $26.00. The Commissioner may adopt rules under 3 V.S.A. chapter 25 to implement the provisions of this subsection.

Initial fees collected under subsection (a) of this section shall be allocated as follows:

46 percent to the Transportation Fund.

27 percent to the Department of Fish and Wildlife for deposit into the Nongame Wildlife Account created in

10 V.S.A. § 4048

.

27 percent to the Department of Fish and Wildlife for deposit into the Watershed Management Account created in

10 V.S.A. § 4050

.

Renewal fees collected under subsection (a) of this section shall be allocated as follows:

42 percent to the Department of Fish and Wildlife for deposit into the Nongame Wildlife Account created in

10 V.S.A. § 4048

.

42 percent to the Department of Fish and Wildlife for deposit into the Watershed Management Account created in

10 V.S.A. § 4050

.

16 percent to the Transportation Fund.

The Commissioner of Fish and Wildlife is authorized to deposit fees collected by the Department of Fish and Wildlife under subsections (b) and (c) of this section into the Conservation Camp Fund when the fees collected exceed the annual funding needs of the Nongame Wildlife Account and the Watershed Management Account.

HISTORY:

Added

1995, No. 189

(Adj. Sess.), § 14, eff. May 22, 1996; amended

1997, No. 59

, § 73, eff. June 30, 1997;

1997, No. 85

(Adj. Sess.), § 4;

2003, No. 160

(Adj. Sess.), § 63, eff. June 9, 2004;

2005, No. 58

, § 1;

2009, No. 50

, § 38;

2011, No. 153

(Adj. Sess.), § 31;

2013, No. 116

(Adj. Sess.), § 9;

2015, No. 159

(Adj. Sess.), § 9;

2017, No. 71

, § 2.

§ 304c.
Motor vehicle registration plates: Building Bright Spaces for Bright Futures Fund.

The Commissioner shall, upon application, issue “Building Bright Spaces for Bright Futures Fund,” referred to as “the Bright Futures Fund,” registration plates for use only on vehicles registered at the pleasure car rate, on trucks registered for less than 26,001 pounds, on vehicles registered to State agencies under section 376 of this title, and excluding vehicles registered under the International Registration Plan. Plates so acquired shall be mounted on the front and rear of the vehicle. The Commissioner of Motor Vehicles shall utilize the graphic design recommended by the Commissioner for Children and Families for the special plates to enhance the public awareness of the State’s interest in supporting children’s services. Applicants shall apply on forms prescribed by the Commissioner of Motor Vehicles and shall pay an initial fee of $24.00 in addition to the annual fee for registration. In following years, in addition to the annual registration fee, the holder of a Bright Futures Fund plate shall pay a renewal fee of $24.00. The Commissioner of Motor Vehicles shall adopt rules under 3 V.S.A. chapter 25 to implement the provisions of this subsection.

Fees collected under subsection (a) of this section shall be allocated as follows:

29 percent to the Transportation Fund.

71 percent to the Department for Children and Families for deposit in the Bright Futures Fund created in

33 V.S.A. § 3531

.

Renewal fees collected under subsection (a) of this section shall be allocated as follows:

79 percent to the Department for Children and Families for deposit in the Bright Futures Fund in

33 V.S.A. § 3531

.

21 percent to the Transportation Fund.

The Department of Motor Vehicles shall be charged by the Department of Corrections for the production of the Bright Futures Fund license plates.

HISTORY:

Added

2001, No. 142

(Adj. Sess.), § 140; amended

2003, No. 66

, § 138a;

2003, No. 160

(Adj. Sess.), § 64, eff. June 9, 2004;

2009, No. 50

, § 83;

2015, No. 159

(Adj. Sess.), § 10;

2017, No. 71

, § 3;

2019, No. 131

(Adj. Sess.), § 141.

§ 305.
Registration periods.

The Commissioner of Motor Vehicles shall issue registration certificates, validation stickers, and number plates upon initial registration, and registration certificates and validation stickers for each succeeding renewal period of registration upon payment of the registration fee. Number plates so issued will become void one year from the first day of the month following the month of issue, unless a longer initial registration period is authorized by law or unless this period is extended through renewal. Registrations issued for motor trucks shall become void one year from the first day of the month following the month of issue.

The Commissioner shall issue a registration certificate, validation sticker, and number plates for each motor vehicle owned by the State, which shall be valid for a period of five years. Such motor vehicle shall be considered properly registered while the issued number plates are attached to the motor vehicle. The Commissioner may replace such number plates when in his or her discretion their condition requires.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (d) of this section, no plate is valid unless the validation sticker is affixed to the rear plate in the manner prescribed by the Commissioner in section 511 of this title.

When a registration for a motor vehicle, snowmobile, motorboat, or all-terrain vehicle is processed electronically, a receipt shall be available electronically and for printing. An electronic or printed receipt shall serve as a temporary registration for 10 days after the date of the transaction. An electronic receipt may be shown to an enforcement officer using a portable electronic device. Use of a portable electronic device to display the receipt does not in itself constitute consent for an officer to access other contents of the device.

HISTORY:

Amended

1961, No. 54

, § 3, eff. April 1, 1962;

1965, No. 70

, § 2;

1967, No. 129

, § 3;

1969, No. 259

(Adj. Sess.), § 7;

1971, No. 150

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1973;

1977, No. 85

,§§ 2, 3, eff. Sept. 1, 1977;

1979, No. 34

, § 2, eff. Nov. 1, 1979;

1985, No. 124

(Adj. Sess.), § 2;

1987, No. 111

, § 10;

1993, No. 9

, § 1, eff. Feb. 1, 1994;

1995, No. 112

(Adj. Sess.), § 5;

1997, No. 39

, § 2;

2001, No. 75

(Adj. Sess.), § 2;

2009, No. 50

, § 112;

2009, No. 152

(Adj. Sess.), § 18;

2011, No. 164

(Adj. Sess.), § 2;

2013, No. 57

, § 5;

2013, No. 189

(Adj. Sess.), § 3;

2017, No. 71

, § 4;

2019, No. 131

(Adj. Sess.), § 142.

§ 305a.
Repealed. 2015, No. 147 (Adj. Sess.), § 4, eff. May 31, 2016.

§ 306.
Title to number plates.

All number plates shall be the property of the State, and title shall not pass to a person registering a motor vehicle under the provisions of this title.

HISTORY:

Amended

2019, No. 131

(Adj. Sess.), § 143.